Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2 Licenses and Fees
57-3-208. Certificate required — Contents — Exceptions.
[Effective on July 1, 2021. See the version effective until July 1, 2021.]

As a condition precedent to the issuance of a license under § 57-3-204, every applicant for a license under that section shall submit with the application to the commission a certificate signed by the county mayor or chair of the county commission in which the licensed premises are to be located if outside the corporate limits of a municipality or, if within a municipality, from the mayor or a majority of the commission, city council, or legislative body of the municipality, by whatsoever name designated, or if the municipality has no mayor, from the highest executive of the municipality.

The certificate must state:

That the applicant or applicants who are to be in actual charge of the business have not been convicted of a felony within a ten-year period immediately preceding the date of application and, if a corporation, that the executive officers or those in control have not been convicted of a felony within a ten-year period immediately preceding the date of the application;

That the applicant or applicants have secured a location for the business which complies with all restrictions of any local law, ordinance, or resolution, duly adopted by the local jurisdiction, as to the location of the business;

That the applicant or applicants have complied with any local law, ordinance or resolution duly adopted by the local authorities regulating the number of retail licenses to be issued within the jurisdiction;

[Expired effective July 1, 2021. See the Compiler's Notes.]

The certificate remains valid unless there is a change of ownership or location. If either of these events occurs, a new certificate must be obtained prior to renewal.

Each applicant or officer identified in subdivision (b)(1)(A) must obtain and submit with the certificate a local and national criminal history record obtained from a third party using a multistate criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation. A criminal history record that indicates that the applicant or officer has not been convicted of a felony within the immediately preceding ten-year period serves as proof satisfactory that the applicant or officer has complied with subdivision (b)(1)(A).

Municipalities and counties are hereby authorized to limit the location of retail liquor stores and the number of licenses issued within their jurisdictions. No local law, ordinance or resolution may limit the location and number of licenses authorized under § 57-3-204, so as to unreasonably restrict the availability of alcoholic beverages for the residents of such municipalities and counties. A local jurisdiction may impose reasonable residency requirements on any applicant. However, if a local jurisdiction does impose such residency requirements, such local jurisdiction shall not be authorized to impose any residency requirement on any applicant who has been continuously licensed pursuant to § 57-3-204 for seven (7) consecutive years.

An applicant may seek review of the denial of a certificate by instituting an action in the chancery court having jurisdiction over the municipality or county within sixty (60) days of the denial.

A failure on the part of the issuing authority to grant or deny the certificate within sixty (60) days of the written application for such shall be deemed a granting of the certificate.

The requirement imposed by this section to submit a certificate shall not be applicable to any applicant if:

The authority of the county or municipality charged with the responsibility to issue the certificate required herein shall have failed to grant or deny the certificate within sixty (60) days after written application for such certificate is filed; or

The applicant submits a final order of a court holding that the denial of the required certificate was unreasonable, as established by subsections (c) and (d).

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 9a, as added by Acts 1949, ch. 284, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.14a (Williams, § 6648.12a); Acts 1951, ch. 52, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 24; Acts 1976, ch. 438, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-121; Acts 1980, ch. 894, § 1; 1981, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 451, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2015, ch. 269, § 2; 2017, ch. 357, § 1; 2018, ch. 783, § 12; 2019, ch. 136, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2 directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14 provided that sections 7 through 12 of the act shall be repealed on July 1, 2021, and the provisions of this section and §§57-3-204 and57-3-212 as they existed prior to being amended by Sections 7 through 12 of the act shall be reinstated.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective until July 1, 2021, added (b)(1)(D) which read: “For any applicant or applicants acquiring the right to purchase from an existing licensee and transferring the license to another location, that the new location is not within one thousand five hundred feet (1,500') of another location engaged in the retail sale of alcoholic spirituous beverages and is located within the same jurisdiction wherein the transferor premises was located.”

The 2019 amendment added (b)(1)(E).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14. April 20, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 136, § 6. August 1, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 6, 8.

57-3-209. Collectors of containers that hold alcoholic beverages.

For purposes of this section:

“Alcoholic beverage collector” means an individual who collects commemorative bottles containing alcoholic beverages, wine or distilled spirits, where the individual displays the collection in a location available to the public, either by appointment or on a regular schedule, and who sells collectible alcoholic beverages for the purpose of collection, without the intent that the collectible alcoholic beverage be consumed; and

“Collectible alcoholic beverage” means an alcoholic beverage, distilled spirit or wine in a unique or commemorative bottle, decanter or other container, not generally available at a licensee holding a permit issued pursuant to § 57-3-204.

Any individual qualifying as an alcoholic beverage collector may apply to the commission for a license as an alcoholic beverage collector, authorizing that individual to purchase wine, distilled spirits and other alcoholic beverages from any entity authorized to sell such products and shall be authorized to sell, in a face to face transaction only, collectible alcoholic beverages, as defined in this section, to any person twenty-one (21) years of age or older. The license may be issued notwithstanding the requirements of § 57-3-106.

No license shall be issued under this section to any person who has an interest, direct or indirect, in any business holding a license issued under chapter 2 of this title or pursuant to § 57-3-202, § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207, § 57-3-218 or § 57-4-101.

Any sale of any alcoholic beverage, wine or distilled spirit by an individual licensed under this section shall be presumed not to be a sale of a collectible alcoholic beverage if the price of the sale is not at least three hundred percent (300%) of the price of the same brand, vintage, quantity and type of alcoholic beverage, distilled spirit or wine as is available at any licensee holding a license pursuant to § 57-3-204. The alcoholic beverage collector shall have the burden of proving that any sale authorized under this section satisfies the requirements of this section.

An alcoholic beverage collector shall be responsible for remitting all sales taxes due resulting from any sale by the collector under this section. Where the collector cannot demonstrate that the collectible alcoholic beverage was purchased from a licensee holding a license pursuant to § 57-3-204, the collector shall also pay the taxes imposed pursuant to § 57-3-302.

The taxes levied on sales made by an alcoholic beverage collector as authorized by this section shall become due and payable on the first day of each month following the month when the sales occur and shall become delinquent if not paid on or before the twentieth day of each following month. For the purpose of ascertaining the amount of tax payable, it is the duty of each alcoholic beverage collector to transmit to the commissioner of revenue a return on forms prescribed by the commissioner.

Each applicant for an alcoholic beverage collector's license under this section shall pay to the commission a one-time, nonrefundable fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) when the application is submitted for review. An alcoholic beverage collector's license under this section shall not be issued until the applicant has paid to the commission the annual license fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Acts 2009, ch. 484, § 1; 2011, ch. 451, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-3-209 (Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-122), concerning bonds of licensees, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 514, § 1.

57-3-210. Restrictions on license holders — Employees — Penalties.

The license fee for every license issued under this chapter shall be payable by the person making application for such license and to whom it is issued, and no other person shall pay for any license issued under such sections. In addition to all other penalties provided in this chapter, a violation of this section shall authorize and require the revocation of the license, the fee for which was paid by another, and also the revocation of the license, if any, of the person so paying for the license of another.

No wholesaler's or retailer's license shall be issued to a person who is a holder of a public office, either appointive or elective, or who is a public employee, either national, state, city or county. It is unlawful for any such person to have any interest in such wholesale or retail business, directly or indirectly, either proprietary or by means of any loan, mortgage, or lien, or to participate in the profits of any such business;

The foregoing shall not apply to uncompensated appointees to municipal boards and commissions where the boards or commissions on which such appointees serve have no duty to vote for, overlook, or in any manner superintend the sale of alcoholic beverages.

No wholesaler or retailer shall be a person who has been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude, within ten (10) years prior to the time the person or the concern with which the person is connected shall receive a license; provided, however, that this subsection (c) shall not apply to any person who has been so convicted, but whose rights of citizenship have been restored or judgment of infamy has been removed by a court of competent jurisdiction; and in the case of any such conviction occurring after a license has been issued and received, the license shall immediately be revoked, if such convicted felon be an individual licensee, and if not, the partnership, corporation or association with which the felon is connected shall immediately discharge the felon.

None of the licenses or permits provided by this chapter, or which may be issued thereunder, shall under any condition be issued to any person who, within ten (10) years preceding application for such license or permit shall have been convicted of any offense under this title or of any similar law of any other state or of the United States prohibiting or regulating the sale, possession, transportation, storing, manufacturing, or otherwise handling intoxicating liquors or who has, during such period, been engaged in business alone or with others, in violation of any of such laws or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, as they existed on March 2, 1939, or as they existed or may exist thereafter.

No manufacturer, brewer or wholesaler shall have any interest in the business or building containing licensed premises of any other person having a license under this chapter, or in the fixtures of any such person.

It is unlawful for any person to have ownership in, or participate, in, either directly or indirectly, the profits of any wholesale or retail business licensed under this chapter, unless the interest in such business and the nature, extent and character thereof shall appear on the application; or if the interest is acquired after the issuance of a license, unless it shall be fully disclosed to the commission and approved by it. Where such interest is owned by such person on or before the application for any license, the burden shall be upon such person to see that this section is fully complied with, whether the person personally signs or prepares the application, or whether the same is prepared by another; or if such interest is acquired after the issuance of the license, the burden of such disclosure of the acquisition of such interest shall be upon both the seller and the purchaser.

A violation of this subsection (f) is a Class C misdemeanor.

No person shall be employed in the storage, sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages except a citizen of the United States.

No manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer, or any employee thereof, engaged in the physical manufacture, storage, sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages shall be a person under eighteen (18) years of age, and it is unlawful for any wholesaler or retailer to employ any person under eighteen (18) years of age for the physical storage, sale, or distribution of alcoholic beverages, or to permit any such person under such age on its place of business to engage in the manufacture, storage, sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages.

No manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer shall employ in the manufacture, storage, sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages, any person who, within ten (10) years prior to the date of employment, shall have been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude, and in case an employee should be so convicted, the employee shall immediately be discharged; provided, however, that this subsection (i) shall not apply to any person who has been so convicted, but whose rights of citizenship have been restored, or judgment of infamy has been removed by a court of competent jurisdiction.

This section shall be in addition to any other restriction or condition which may be contained elsewhere in this chapter or chapters 1 and 9 of this title.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 5, 12; 1945, ch. 167, § 7; 1949, ch. 284, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.15, 6648.16 (Williams, §§ 6648.8, 6648.14, 6648.15); Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 26; 1971, ch. 162, § 2; 1971, ch. 169, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 413, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-123; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2006, ch. 616, § 2.

Sentencing Reform Notes.

A penalty provided in this section was changed to a Class C misdemeanor on November 1, 1989. See Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113, and §§40-35-110,40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 11, 15.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Protection of Aliens, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 235.

Attorney General Opinions. Restriction on licensee holding public office deemed constitutional, OAG 94-145 (12/29/94).

57-3-211. Display of license, rules and regulations.

Any person granted a license to carry on any of the businesses or undertakings contemplated by this chapter shall, before being qualified to do business, display and post, and keep displayed and posted, in the most conspicuous place on the premises, such license, and shall promptly procure and keep at the place of business a copy of the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 27; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-124.

57-3-212. Transfer of permits restricted.
[Effective until July 1, 2021. See the version effective on July 1, 2021.]

The holder of a license may not sell, assign, or transfer such license to any other person other than to a person that the commission has approved pursuant to § 57-3-204. Any license issued or approved for transfer shall be good and valid only for the twelve (12) months after the same was issued or approved for transfer by the commission. The license proposed to be transferred may be for the same location or, with commission approval, transferred from one (1) location to another location.

Licensees who are serving in the military forces of the United States in time of war may appoint an agent to operate under the license of the licensee during the absence of the licensee. In such instances, the license shall continue to be carried and renewed in the name of the owner. The agent of the licensee shall conform to all the requirements of a licensee under this chapter, including the furnishing of a certificate as provided under § 57-3-208. No person who is ineligible to obtain a license under this chapter shall be eligible to serve as the agent of a licensee under this section.

Except as expressly authorized, there shall be no transfer of any permit from the holder thereof to another, nor, except in special instances to be fixed by rule or regulation of the commission, any transfer thereof from one (1) location to another.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 5, 14; 1943, ch. 98, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.16, 6648.17 (Williams, §§ 6648.8, 6648.17); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 28; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-125; Acts 1981, ch. 152, § 1; 2018, ch. 783, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14 provided that sections 7 through 12 of the act shall be repealed on July 1, 2021, and the provisions of this section and §§57-3-204 and57-3-208 as they existed prior to being amended by Sections 7 through 12 of the act shall be reinstated.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective until July 1, 2021, rewrote (a) which read, “(a) The holder of a license may not sell, assign or transfer such license to any other person, and such license shall be good and valid only for the twelve (12) months after the same was issued.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14. April 20, 2018.

57-3-212. Transfer of permits restricted.
[Effective on July 1, 2021. See the version effective until July 1, 2021.]

The holder of a license may not sell, assign or transfer such license to any other person, and such license shall be good and valid only for the twelve (12) months after the same was issued.

Licensees who are serving in the military forces of the United States in time of war may appoint an agent to operate under the license of the licensee during the absence of the licensee. In such instances, the license shall continue to be carried and renewed in the name of the owner. The agent of the licensee shall conform to all the requirements of a licensee under this chapter, including the furnishing of a certificate as provided under § 57-3-208. No person who is ineligible to obtain a license under this chapter shall be eligible to serve as the agent of a licensee under this section.

Except as expressly authorized, there shall be no transfer of any permit from the holder thereof to another, nor, except in special instances to be fixed by rule or regulation of the commission, any transfer thereof from one (1) location to another.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, §§ 5, 14; 1943, ch. 98, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6648.16, 6648.17 (Williams, §§ 6648.8, 6648.17); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 28; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-125; Acts 1981, ch. 152, § 1; 2018, ch. 783, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14 provided that sections 7 through 12 of the act shall be repealed on July 1, 2021, and the provisions of this section and §§57-3-204 and57-3-208 as they existed prior to being amended by Sections 7 through 12 of the act shall be reinstated.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective until July 1, 2021, rewrote (a) to read, “The holder of a license may not sell, assign, or transfer such license to any other person other than to a person that the commission has approved pursuant to §57-3-204. Any license issued or approved for transfer shall be good and valid only for the twelve (12) months after the same was issued or approved for transfer by the commission. The license proposed to be transferred may be for the same location or, with commission approval, transferred from one (1) location to another location.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 783, § 14. April 20, 2018.

57-3-213. Expiration of licenses — Renewal.

Each license shall expire twelve (12) months following the date of its issuance. The commission is authorized to issue renewal licenses for all qualified persons licensed as of July 1, 1981 for a period of time greater than three (3) months but less than a year so as to distribute expiration dates throughout the year, for the year following July 1, 1981 only. The license fee or the proportionate part thereof prescribed by this chapter shall be paid in advance at the time the application for renewal is made as provided by this chapter.

Each license issued pursuant to this chapter may be renewed upon application therefor by the licensee. The renewal application shall be accompanied by the payment of the annual fee for such license. Each license shall automatically expire twelve (12) months from the date of its issuance unless the licensee has filed a renewal application and paid the annual license fee or privilege tax required by this title.

The commission shall consider the application with all other evidence which it may obtain by investigation or otherwise in determining whether the license is to be renewed. The commission shall make such order, as the entire record justifies, granting or refusing the renewal application, and such order shall be effective from its date. If the license is not renewed, the applicant is entitled to the hearing and notice requirements as set out in § 57-3-214.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; 1949, ch. 284, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; Acts 1951, ch. 52, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 29; Acts 1976, ch. 438, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-126; Acts 1981, ch. 152, § 2; 1982, ch. 577, § 1; 1985, ch. 76, § 1; 2019, ch. 136, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, effective August 1, 2019, deleted former (d) which read: “(d) In addition to these requirements the application for license renewal shall be accompanied by a certificate as set forth in §57-3-208, which certificate shall be valid for two (2) years. A new certificate shall be required every other year, to be submitted with the application for renewal.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 136, § 6. August 1, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 5, 6, 8, 22.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1956 Tennessee Survey (Joseph Martin, Jr.), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 1032.

57-3-214. Revocation, suspension or denial of license or permit.

Whenever, under this chapter, the commission is authorized to revoke a license or permit issued by it, except in those cases where revocation is mandatory, it may, if, in its discretion, it feels that revocation of the license or permit is too drastic a penalty, suspend the license or permit, and the procedure for such suspension and the review of such suspension order shall be the same as that prescribed herein for revocation of licenses or permits issued under this chapter.

If a revocation of license is being contemplated with respect to a retailer's license on premises owned by a person, firm or corporation not the licensee, a copy of the notice sent to the licensee shall also be sent to the owner at the address on record with the commission.

The commission or other employee designated by the commission is empowered to subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance and the production of records, memoranda, papers and other documents at any hearing authorized under this section.

At all hearings provided for herein, the commission shall provide a stenographer to take a stenographic record of the evidence adduced at such hearing. The applicant, licensee, permittee, or protestant shall be entitled to a copy of the stenographic record, upon application thereof, and upon paying the reasonable cost thereof to be fixed by the commission. The commission may require the applicant to bear the costs of any hearing required on the application including any fees to court reporter and preparation and copying of a transcript or stenographic record of such hearing. All such costs must be paid by the applicant before it may receive its license.

No judge of any court shall have the authority to supersede, stay or enjoin any order of revocation of the commission issued pursuant to a hearing authorized under this section, but such order shall remain in full force and effect until the final decision by the supreme court except where the judgment of the circuit court is unappealed from and has become a final judgment.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; 1941, ch. 113, § 1; 1945, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; 1949, ch. 284, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 30; Acts 1970, ch. 469, § 1; 1977, ch. 461, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-127; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; 1981, ch. 465, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 877, § 1; 1986, ch. 738, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. To the extent that they conflict or are inconsistent with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, ch. 5, the provisions in this section for judicial review of the commission's orders are superseded and repealed. Metropolitan Gov't v. Shacklett, 554 S.W.2d 601 (Tenn. 1977).

This section may be affected by T.R.A.P 24.

Cross-References. Gifts or bribes to commission members, mandatory revocation, §57-1-110.

Name on delinquent tax report three times in year, mandatory revocation, §57-1-207.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 8, 9.

Law Reviews.

Methods of Judicial Review over Administrative Actions in Tennessee, 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 657 (1984).

57-3-215. New license after revocation.

Where a license is revoked, no new license shall be issued to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages on the same premises until after the expiration of one (1) year from the date such revocation becomes final and effective.

If the premises are owned by a person, firm or corporation not the licensee, the commission may, in its discretion, waive subsection (a) or reduce the time within which no new license may be granted with respect to the same premises.

Acts 1945, ch. 167, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.16 (Williams, § 6648.8); Acts 1977, ch. 461, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-128.

57-3-216. Federal license as evidence of sales.

The possession of any federal license to sell alcoholic beverages defined in §57-3-101, without the corresponding requisite state license, shall in all cases be prima facie evidence that the holder of such federal license is selling alcoholic beverages in violation of the terms of this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-129.

57-3-217. Winery direct shipper's license.

Any person, firm or corporation that holds a federal basic permit pursuant to the Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), and is in the business of manufacturing, bottling or rectifying wine may apply to the commission for a winery direct shipper's license under this section. Applicants for a winery direct shipper's license shall submit to the commission a copy of the federal basic permit and a permit for the manufacturing, bottling, or rectification of wine from the state where such wine is produced.

A winery direct shipper, meeting the requirements of this section, shall be authorized to make sales and delivery of wine, as defined in § 57-3-101, by common carrier to the citizens of this state over the age of twenty-one (21) who have purchased the wine directly from the winery direct shipper, subject to the limitations and requirements imposed by this section.

As a condition to the issuance of a winery direct shipper's license as authorized in this section, an applicant for the license must satisfy the following conditions:

Pay to the commission a one-time nonrefundable fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) when the application is submitted for review. A winery direct shipper's license under this section shall not be issued until the applicant has paid to the commission the annual license fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150);

Execute a consent to jurisdiction and venue of all actions brought before the commission, any state agency or the courts of this state, such that any and all hearings, appeals and other matters relating to the license of the winery direct shipper shall be held in this state;

Acknowledge, in writing, that it will contract only with common carriers that agree that any delivery of wine made in this state shall be by face-to-face delivery and that deliveries will only be made to individuals who demonstrate that the individuals are over twenty-one (21) years of age and the individuals sign upon receipt of the wine.

No winery direct shipper may ship more than a total of nine (9) liters of wine to any individual during any calendar month nor shall the shipper ship more than twenty-seven (27) liters of wine to any individual in any calendar year.

Any shipment of wine pursuant to this section shall be made only in containers that clearly indicate on the exterior of the container, visible to a person at least three feet (3') away, that the container “CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY”.

A winery direct shipper shall be responsible for remitting all sales taxes due resulting from any sale made under this section. In addition to all sales taxes imposed upon such sale, a winery direct shipper shall remit the gallonage tax as imposed by § 57-3-302.

The taxes levied on sales made by a winery direct shipper as authorized by this section shall become due and payable on the first day of each month following the month during which the sales occur, and shall become delinquent if not paid on or before the twentieth day of each such following month. For the purpose of ascertaining the amount of tax due, it is the duty of any winery direct shipper licensed pursuant to this section to transmit to the commissioner of revenue appropriate returns on forms prescribed by the commissioner.

Upon request of the commission or its designated agent, any winery direct shipper licensed pursuant to this section shall provide to the commission, under penalty of perjury, a list of any wine shipped to an address within this state, including the addressee.

The commission may enforce the requirements of this section by administrative action, may suspend or revoke a winery direct shipper's license and may accept an offer in compromise in lieu of suspension.

A winery direct shipper that is found to have violated this title, in addition to any fine imposed by the commission, shall reimburse the commission for all costs incurred in connection with the investigation and administrative action, including the out-of-pocket costs and reasonable personnel costs.

No winery direct shipper may avoid liability under this section by subcontracting with a third party to perform its obligations required pursuant to this section.

The commission and the department of revenue are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations that may be necessary to implement this section, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

It is an offense for a person who does not possess a winery direct shipper's license to ship wine to residents of this state.

A violation of subdivision (g)(1) is a Class E felony, punishable by a fine only.

Each common carrier that contracts with a winery direct shipper under this section for delivery of wine, beer, or other alcoholic beverages into this state shall prepare and file monthly with the department of revenue a report of known wine, beer, or other alcoholic beverage shipments containing the name of the common carrier making the report, the period of time covered by the report, the name and business address of the consignor, the name and address of each consignee, the weight of the package delivered to each consignee, a unique tracking number, and the date of delivery. Reports received by the department of revenue must be made available to the public pursuant to the open records law, compiled in title 10, chapter 7.

Upon the request of the commissioner of revenue, any records supporting the report must be made available to the department of revenue within a reasonable time after the commissioner makes a written request for such records. Any records containing information relating to such reports must be retained and preserved for a period of two (2) years, unless destruction of the records prior to the end of such retention period is authorized in writing by the department of revenue. Such records must be open and available for inspection by the department of revenue upon written request. Reports must also be made available to any law enforcement agency or regulatory body of any local government in this state in which the common carrier making the report resides or does business.

Any common carrier that willfully fails to make reports in accordance with this section or that violates any rules of the department of revenue for the administration and enforcement of this section is subject to a notification of violation. If a common carrier continually fails to make reports, the common carrier may be fined in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each delivery not reported to the department of revenue. Unpaid fines assessed under this subdivision (h)(3) must be collected in accordance with title 67, chapter 1.

This subsection (h) does not apply to common carriers regulated under 49 U.S.C. §§ 10101 et seq., or to rail trailer-on-flatcar/container-on-flatcar (TOFC/COFC) service, as defined in 49 CFR § 1090.1, or highway TOFC/COFC service provided by a rail carrier, either itself or jointly with a motor carrier, as part of continuous intermodal freight transportation, including, without limitation, any other TOFC/COFC transportation as defined under federal law.

Acts 2009, ch. 348, § 1; 2011, ch. 213, § 1; 2017, ch. 486, § 1; 2018, ch. 765, § 7; 2018, ch. 933, § 3; 2019, ch. 263, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding allowing an in-state or out-of-state entity to ship wine directly to consumers age twenty-one years or older in this state for personal use, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 348.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added (h).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 765 added the second sentence in (a).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 933, in the first sentence of (h)(1), inserted “, beer, or other alcoholic beverages” and substituted “wine, beer, or other alcoholic beverage shipments” for “wine shipments”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “winery direct shipper” for “direct shipper” and “winery direct shipper’s” for “direct shipper’s” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 486, § 2. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 765, § 8. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 933, § 7. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 263, § 2. April 30, 2019.

Cross-References. Penalty for a Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. A foreign corporation or limited liability company licensed as a nonresident seller or direct shipper must obtain a certificate of authority from the Tennessee secretary of state only if the corporation or company transacts business in the state within the meaning of the relevant statutes, which depends on the character and extent of the corporation’s or the company’s transactions and business in the state. OAG 18-28, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (7/6/2018).